Utah statutes.
7-1-1001.   Definitions -- Written consent or court order for disclosure by financial institution -- Exception.

(1)  As used in this part:

(a)  "Account holder" means a person for whom an account is held by a financial institution.

(b)  "Governmental entity" means:

(i)  the state, including:

(A)  a department;

(B)  an institution;

(C)  a board;

(D)  a division;

(E)  a bureau;

(F)  an office;

(G)  a commission;

(H)  a committee; or

(I)  an elected official; and

(ii)  a political subdivision of the state, including:

(A)  a county;

(B)  a city;

(C)  a town;

(D)  a school district;

(E)  a public transit district;

(F)  a redevelopment agency;

(G)  a special improvement district; or

(H)  a taxing district.

(c)  "Nonprotected record" means a record maintained by a financial institution to facilitate the conduct of the financial institution's business regarding a person or account, including:

(i)  the existence of an account;

(ii)  the opening and closing dates of an account;

(iii)  the name under which an account is held; and

(iv)  the name, address, and telephone number of an account holder.

(d)  "Protected record" means a record that is not defined as a nonprotected record.

(e)  "Record" means information that is:

(i)  prepared, owned, received, or retained by a financial institution;

(ii) (A)  inscribed on a tangible medium; or

(B)  stored in an electronic or other medium; and

(iii)  retrievable in perceivable form.

(2)  Except for a governmental entity listed in Subsection 7-1-1006(1), an individual acting on behalf of a governmental entity may not request, obtain by subpoena, or otherwise obtain information from a state or federally chartered financial institution that constitutes a record reflecting the financial condition of any person without first obtaining:

(a)  written permission from all account holders of the account referenced in the record to be examined; or

(b)  an order from a court of competent jurisdiction permitting access to the record.

(3)  This section does not apply to a review made by the commissioner to determine whether a financial institution is operating in accordance with law.

